src/ParadigmFeatures/ParadigmDefects/GetParadigmDefects.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +ParDef1 +ParDef3 +ParDef4 +ParDef5 +ParDef6 +ParDef7 +ParDef8 +ParDef9 +ParDef1%0 +ParDef11 +ParDef12 +ParDef13 +ParDef14 +ParDef15 +ParDef17

LEXICON Root
крепостца́		#;
овца́     #;
себя́		ParDef1;
не́кого		ParDef1;
друг_дру́га		ParDef1;
не́чего		ParDef1;
не́кто		ParDef3;
не́что		ParDef4;
пол		ParDef4;
ма́ло		ParDef4;
нема́ло		ParDef4;
дрове́ц		ParDef5;
щец		ParDef5;
внуча́та		ParDef6;
девча́та		ParDef6;
ребя́та		ParDef6;
молодожёны		ParDef6;
роди́тели		ParDef6;
де́тки		ParDef6;
дети́шки		ParDef6;
де́тушки		ParDef6;
зверя́тки		ParDef6;
люди́шки		ParDef6;
ребя́тки		ParDef6;
ребяти́шки		ParDef6;
ребя́тушки		ParDef6;
солда́тушки		ParDef6;
теля́тки		ParDef6;
котя́тки		ParDef6;
мыша́тки		ParDef6;
порося́тки		ParDef6;
дре́вние		ParDef6;
дома́шние		ParDef6;
молоды́е		ParDef6;
родны́е		ParDef6;
новобра́чные		ParDef6;
брачу́ющиеся		ParDef6;
сот		    ParDef7;
челове́к   #;
челове́к   ParDef8;
мга		ParDef9;
мгла		ParDef9;
полумгла́   ParDef9;
мзда		ParDef9;
тьма		ParDef9;
полутьма́		ParDef9;
хна		ParDef9;
скло		ParDef9;
сткло   ParDef9;
казна́		ParDef9;
камка́		ParDef9;
пенька́		ParDef9;
тоска́		ParDef9;
треска́		ParDef10;
огнь		ParDef11;
пла́мень		ParDef11;
порося́		ParDef11;
ничто́		ParDef11;
по́лымя		ParDef12;
сре́дний		ParDef13;
по́здний		ParDef13;
пре́жний		ParDef13;
поро́жний		ParDef13;
пустопоро́жний		ParDef13;
кра́йний		ParDef13;
бескра́йний		ParDef13;
ра́нний		ParDef13;
вну́тренний		ParDef13;
сторо́нний		ParDef13;
посторо́нний		ParDef13;
совершенноле́тний		ParDef13;
дома́шний		ParDef13;
вне́шний		ParDef13;
ли́шний		ParDef13;
да́льний		ParDef13;
суя́гный		ParDef13;
гроте́скный		ParDef13;
родно́й		ParDef13;
блажно́й		ParDef13;
сквозно́й		ParDef13;
срамно́й		ParDef13;
земно́й		ParDef13;
цветно́й		ParDef13;
ручно́й		ParDef13;
шально́й		ParDef13;
голубо́й		ParDef13;
ходово́й		ParDef13;
делово́й		ParDef13;
озорно́й		ParDef13;
золото́й		ParDef13;
гора́зд		ParDef14;
до́лжен		ParDef14;
люб		ParDef14;
рад		ParDef14;
великова́т		ParDef14;
малова́т		ParDef14;
како́в		ParDef14;
тако́в		ParDef14;
одинёхонек		ParDef14;
одинёшенек		ParDef14;
радёхонек		ParDef14;
радёшенек		ParDef14;
дво́е		ParDef15;
тро́е		ParDef15;
че́тверо		ParDef15;
пя́теро		ParDef15;
ше́стеро		ParDef15;
се́меро		ParDef15;
во́сьмеро		ParDef15;
де́вятеро		ParDef15;
де́сятеро		ParDef15;
кой		ParDef17;

LEXICON ParDef1
+ParDef1	#;

LEXICON ParDef3
+ParDef3	#;

LEXICON ParDef4
+ParDef4	#;

LEXICON ParDef5
+ParDef5	#;

LEXICON ParDef6
+ParDef6	#;

LEXICON ParDef7
+ParDef7	#;

LEXICON ParDef8
+ParDef8	#;

LEXICON ParDef9
+ParDef9	#;

LEXICON ParDef10
+ParDef1%0	#;

LEXICON ParDef11
+ParDef11	#;

LEXICON ParDef12
+ParDef12	#;

LEXICON ParDef13
+ParDef13	#;

LEXICON ParDef14
+ParDef14	#;

LEXICON ParDef15
+ParDef15	#;

LEXICON ParDef17
+ParDef17	#;
